en: Chamois fresh meat
fr: viande fraîche de Chamois
hr: Svježe meso divokoze
nl: Verse gemsvlezen

en: Goose fresh meat
fr: Viande fraîche d'oie
hr: Svježe meso guske
lt: Šviežia žąsiena
nl: Verse ganzenvlezen

en: Ratites fresh meat
nl: Verse loopvogelvlezen

en: Guinea-fowl fresh meat
nl: Verse parelhoenvlezen

en: Partridge fresh meat
hr: Jarebica svježe meso
lt: Šviežia kurapkų mėsa
nl: Verse fazantvlezen

en: Quail fresh meat
hr: Svježe meso prepelica
lt: Šviežia putpelių mėsa
nl: Verse kwartelvlezen

en: Meat preparations
bg: Месни заготовки
ca: Preparat de carn
de: Fleischzubereitungen
es: Preparados de carne
fi: lihavalmisteet
fr: Préparations de viande
hr: Mesnih pripravaka
it: Preparazioni a base di carne
lt: Mėsos ruošiniai
nl: Vleesbereidingen
zh: 肉类调制品

en: Skewers, Kebabs, kebab, kabobs, kabob, kababs, kabab
de: Spieße
es: Pinchos, Brochetas
fi: Vartaat
fr: Brochettes, brochette
hr: Ražnjići
ja: ケバブ
nl: Spiesjes
zh: 烤串

en: Vegetarian skewers
fr: Brochettes végétariennes

en: Meat skewers
de: Fleischspieße
es: Pinchos de carne, Brochetas de carne
fr: Brochettes de viande
hr: Mesni ražnjići
lt: Mėsos iešmeliai

en: Mixed meat on skewer
fr: Brochette mixte de viande
hr: Miješano meso na ražnjić
lt: Įvairi mėsa ant iešmo

en: Frozen mixed meat on skewer
fr: Brochette mixte de viande surgelée

en: Beef skewers
de: Rindfleischspieße, Rinderspieße
fr: Brochettes de bœuf, brochette de bœuf
hr: Goveđi ražnjići
lt: Jautienos iešmeliai
nl: Rundvleesspiesjes

en: Frozen beef skewers
fr: Brochettes de bœuf surgelées, brochette de bœuf surgelée

en: Poultry skewers
de: Geflügelspieße
fi: siipikarjavartaat
fr: Brochettes de volailles, brochette de volaille
hr: Ražnjići od peradi
lt: Paukštienos iešmeliai
nl: Gevogeltespiesjes

en: Frozen poultry skewers
fr: Brochettes de volailles surgelées

en: chicken skewers
de: Hähnchenspieße
es: Pinchos de pollo, Brochetas de pollo
fr: Brochettes de poulet
hr: Pileći ražnjići
lt: Vištienos iešmeliai
nl: Kippenspiesjes

en: Frozen chicken skewers
fr: Brochettes de poulet surgelées

en: Yakitori chicken skewers, yakitori chicken
fr: Brochettes de poulet Yakitori, Yakitori de Poulet, Poulet Yakitori
hr: Yakitori pileći ražnjići
ja: 焼き鳥
lt: Yakitori vištienos iešmeliai
nl: Yakitori kipspiesjes

en: Frozen Yakitori chicken skewers, frozen yakitori chicken
fr: Brochettes de poulet Yakitori surgelées, Yakitori de Poulet surgelé, Poulet Yakitori surgelé